Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 1
RELEASE ON BAIL

16-4-101. Bailable offenses - definitions.

All persons shall be bailable by sufficient sureties except:

For capital offenses when proof is evident or presumption is great; or

When, after a hearing held within ninety-six hours of arrest and upon reasonable notice, the court finds that the proof is evident or the presumption is great as to the crime alleged to have been committed and finds that the public would be placed in significant peril if the accused were released on bail and such person is accused in any of the following cases:

A crime of violence alleged to have been committed while on probation or parole resulting from the conviction of a crime of violence;

A crime of violence alleged to have been committed while on bail pending the disposition of a previous crime of violence charge for which probable cause has been found;

A crime of violence alleged to have been committed after two previous felony convictions, or one such previous felony conviction if such conviction was for a crime of violence, upon charges separately brought and tried under the laws of this state or under the laws of any other state, the United States, or any territory subject to the jurisdiction of the United States which, if committed in this state, would be a felony;

A crime of possession of a weapon by a previous offender alleged to have been committed in violation of section 18-12-108 (2)(b), (2)(c), (4)(b), (4)(c), or (5), C.R.S.;

Sexual assault, as described in section 18-3-402, sexual assault in the first degree, as described in section 18-3-402, as it existed prior to July 1, 2000, sexual assault in the second degree, as described in section 18-3-403, as it existed prior to July 1, 2000, sexual assault on a child, as described in section 18-3-405, or sexual assault on a child by one in a position of trust, as described in section 18-3-405.3 in which the victim is fourteen years of age or younger and seven or more years younger than the accused.

When a person has been convicted of a crime of violence or a crime of possession of a weapon by a previous offender, as described in section 18-12-108 (2)(b), (2)(c), (4)(b), (4)(c), or (5), C.R.S., at the trial court level and such person is appealing such conviction or awaiting sentencing for such conviction and the court finds that the public would be placed in significant peril if the convicted person were released on bail.

For purposes of this section, "crime of violence" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 18-1.3-406 (2), C.R.S.

In any capital case, the defendant may make a written motion for admission to bail upon the ground that the proof is not evident or that presumption is not great, and the court shall promptly conduct a hearing upon such motion. At such hearing, the burden shall be upon the people to establish that the proof is evident or that the presumption is great. The court may combine in a single hearing the questions as to whether the proof is evident or the presumption great with the determination of the existence of probable cause to believe that the defendant committed the crime charged.

Except in the case of a capital offense, if a person is denied bail under this section, the trial of the person shall be commenced not more than ninety-one days after the date on which bail is denied. If the trial is not commenced within ninety-one days and the delay is not attributable to the defense, the court shall immediately schedule a bail hearing and shall set the amount of the bail for the person.

When a person is arrested for a crime of violence, as defined in section 16-1-104 (8.5), or a criminal offense alleging the use or possession of a deadly weapon or the causing of bodily injury to another person, or a criminal offense alleging the possession of a weapon by a previous offender, as described in section 18-12-108 (2)(b), (2)(c), (4)(b), (4)(c), or (5), C.R.S., and such person is on parole, the law enforcement agency making the arrest shall notify the department of corrections within twenty-four hours. The person so arrested shall not be eligible for bail to be set until at least seventy-two hours from the time of his or her arrest has passed.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 13-1236), ch. 202, p. 820, § 2, effective May 11.

16-4-102. Right to bail - before conviction.

Any person who is in custody, and for whom the court has not set bond and conditions of release pursuant to the applicable rule of criminal procedure, and who is not subject to the provisions of section 16-4-101 (5), has the right to a hearing to determine bond and conditions of release. A person in custody may also request a hearing so that bond and conditions of release can be set. Upon receiving the request, the judge shall notify the district attorney immediately of the arrested person's request, and the district attorney has the right to attend and advise the court of matters pertinent to the type of bond and conditions of release to be set. The judge shall also order the appropriate law enforcement agency having custody of the prisoner to bring him or her before the court forthwith, and the judge shall set bond and conditions of release if the offense for which the person was arrested is bailable. It is not a prerequisite to bail that a criminal charge of any kind has been filed.

The arresting jurisdiction shall bring an in-custody arrestee before a court for bond setting as soon as practicable, but no later than forty-eight hours after an arrestee arrives at a jail or holding facility. A judge, magistrate, or bond hearing officer shall hold a hearing with an in-custody arrestee at which the court shall enter an individualized bond order as soon as practicable, but no later than forty-eight hours after an arrestee arrives at a jail or holding facility. Notwithstanding the requirement for bond setting within forty-eight hours, it is not a violation of this section if a bond hearing is not held within forty-eight hours when the delay is caused by an emergency that requires the court to close or circumstances in which the defendant refuses to attend court, is unable to attend court due to a debilitating physical ailment, or is unable to proceed due to drug or alcohol use or mental illness. Use of audiovisual conferencing technology is permissible to expedite bond setting hearings, including prior to extradition of the defendant from one county to another in the state of Colorado. When high-speed internet access is unavailable, making audiovisual conferencing impossible, the court may conduct the hearing telephonically.
(2) (a) (I) The arresting jurisdiction shall bring an in-custody arrestee before a court for bond setting as soon as practicable, but no later than forty-eight hours after an arrestee arrives at a jail or holding facility. A judge, magistrate, or bond hearing officer shall hold a hearing with an in-custody arrestee at which the court shall enter an individualized bond order as soon as practicable, but no later than forty-eight hours after an arrestee arrives at a jail or holding facility. Notwithstanding the requirement for bond setting within forty-eight hours, it is not a violation of this section if a bond hearing is not held within forty-eight hours when the delay is caused by an emergency that requires the court to close or circumstances in which the defendant refuses to attend court, is unable to attend court due to a debilitating physical ailment, or is unable to proceed due to drug or alcohol use or mental illness. Use of audiovisual conferencing technology is permissible to expedite bond setting hearings, including prior to extradition of the defendant from one county to another in the state of Colorado. When high-speed internet access is unavailable, making audiovisual conferencing impossible, the court may conduct the hearing telephonically.

This subsection (2)(a) applies only to the initial bond setting by a judge.

This subsection (2)(a) applies to an arrestee who was arrested on or after April 1, 2022.

A judge, judicial officer, or bond hearing officer shall not require a monetary bond to be paid in the defendant's name. Bond may be paid, at a minimum, by cash, money order, or cashier's check. If bond is paid by money order or cashier's check, the money order or cashier's check may be payable to the holding county. Before bond is posted, the sheriff shall provide the defendant and surety, if any, a copy of the notice described in subsection (2)(h)(I) of this section. When the bond is posted, the sheriff shall provide the defendant and surety, if any, a copy of the bond paperwork and information regarding the defendant's next court date. The individual processing the bond shall certify, in writing, that the payor received a copy of the bond paperwork, the notice described in subsection (2)(h)(I) of this section, and information regarding the defendant's next court date and shall place a copy of the certification in the defendant's file. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a sheriff may allow an individual to choose to stay in jail overnight after release when extenuating circumstances exist, including inclement weather, lack of transportation, or lack of shelter.

By January 1, 2022, each jail shall establish a means to pay bond online without the need for the payor to go to the jail in person to pay bond.

The custodian of a jail shall ensure the defendant, a surety on behalf of the defendant, or another third party on behalf of the defendant is not charged more than a ten-dollar bond processing fee.

The custodian of a jail shall also ensure the defendant, a surety on behalf of the defendant, or another third party on behalf of the defendant is not charged any additional transaction fees including kiosk fees; except that the standard credit card processing fee that the credit card company charges may be charged when a credit card is used, or, when a third-party vendor provides defendants the option to pay monetary bond with a credit card, the defendant can be required to pay up to a three-and-one-half percent credit card payment processing fee.

Unless extraordinary circumstances exist, the custodian of a jail shall release a defendant who is granted a personal recognizance bond as soon as practicable but no later than six hours after the defendant is physically present in the jail. Unless extraordinary circumstances exist, the custodian of a jail shall release a defendant who is granted a cash bond as soon as practicable but no later than six hours after bond is set, after the defendant is physically present in the jail, and after the defendant or surety notifies the jail that the defendant or surety is prepared to post bond. If the custodian fails to release the defendant within six hours, the custodian shall inform the defendant and any person posting bond on behalf of the defendant the reason for the delay and shall document the reason for the delay in the defendant's file. A supervisory condition of release does not serve as a legal basis to continue to detain the defendant; except that, if the defendant is ordered released upon condition of being subject to electronic monitoring, the defendant may be held up to as long as practicable but no longer than twenty-four hours after the defendant is physically present in the jail and the defendant's bond has been posted, if such delay is necessary to ensure the defendant is fitted with electronic monitoring and the court has authorized the defendant to be held until the electronic monitor is fitted. If the court orders electronic monitoring for the protection of a specific individual, and the defendant is ordered to have no contact with that specific individual, and the judge orders that the defendant not be released without electronic monitoring based on finding that the electronic monitoring is necessary for public safety, then the time limits regarding release of the defendant in this subsection (2)(e) do not apply. However, if a defendant is held more than twenty-four hours after posting bond awaiting electronic monitoring fitting, the sheriff shall bring the defendant to the court the next day the court is in session and explain the reason for the delay.

A defendant who has posted bond must be released regardless of whether the defendant has paid any outstanding fee, cost, or surcharge, including bond processing fees, booking fees, pretrial supervision fees, or electronic monitoring supervision fees.

For purposes of this section, "extraordinary circumstances" includes an emergency that renders staff unable to process bonds and release defendants, but it does not include a lack of staffing resources or routine administrative practices.

Each sheriff shall post the following notice of rights on the sheriff's website and information about how to file a complaint about violations of subsections (2)(b) to (2)(g) of this section:
(h) (I) (A) Each sheriff shall post the following notice of rights on the sheriff's website and information about how to file a complaint about violations of subsections (2)(b) to (2)(g) of this section:

The notice described in this subsection (2)(h)(I) must include information about how to file a complaint about violations of these provisions.

The sheriff shall include the notice described in subsection (2)(h)(I) of this section in the inmate handbook. The notice must also be available at the bonding counter and provided to any individual, including a defendant, inquiring about posting bond.

Bond fees, booking fees, and other fees or debts never need to be paid to secure a person's release on money bond. A payor need only pay the bond amount in order to secure release.
2. While never a basis to hold a defendant in jail, the following fees are chargeable as a debt to the defendant after release if the payor chooses not to pay the fees at the time of bonding: A $10 bond fee and a maximum 3.5% credit card payment fee. No other bond-related fees may be charged at any time, including any kiosk fees or fees for payment by cash, check, or money order.
3. Bond payments are to be made out to the holding county and are never to be made out in the name of the incarcerated person.
4. A sheriff must release a defendant within six hours after a personal recognizance bond is set and the defendant has returned to jail or within six hours after a cash bond has been set and the defendant has returned to jail and the defendant or surety notified the jail that bond is prepared to be posted, unless extraordinary circumstances exist. In the event of a delay of more than six hours, a surety and the defendant have a right to know what, if any, extraordinary circumstance is causing the delay. Supervisory conditions of release do not justify a delay in release; except that a sheriff may hold a defendant for up to 24 hours if necessary to ensure a defendant is fitted with required electronic monitoring.
5. Anyone who posts a money bond has the right to receive a copy of the bond paperwork, including documentation of the next upcoming court date.
6. A surety may never be asked to use posted bond money to pay a defendant's debts. Only when defendants have posted their own money bond may they be asked if they would like to voluntarily relinquish bond money to pay their debts. Relinquishment of bond money by a defendant to pay a debt is never required and is entirely a voluntary choice by the defendant.

Each sheriff shall post a notice both in the common area of the jail in a location clearly visible to the inmates and in the public portion of the jail where a person posts bond, clearly visible to a person posting bond, that contains the following information:

Bond fees, booking fees, and other fees or debts never need to be paid to secure a person's release on money bond. A payor need only pay the bond amount in order to secure release.

The sheriff shall release a defendant within six hours after a personal recognizance bond is set and the defendant has returned to jail or within six hours after a cash bond has been set and the defendant has returned to jail and the defendant or surety notified the jail that bond is prepared to be posted, unless extraordinary circumstances exist. However, a sheriff may hold a defendant for up to twenty-four hours if necessary to ensure a defendant is fitted with required electronic monitoring.

How to file a complaint about violations of subsections (2)(i)(I) and (2)(i)(II) of this section.

Each sheriff shall create written policies to comply with this subsection (2) by October 1, 2021. The sheriff shall post the policies on the sheriff's website and distribute them to all staff. The sheriff shall train all staff who process bonds or interact with inmates on the policies.

Each sheriff shall review and update the sheriff's website, signage, paperwork, and forms related to bonding to reflect current law by October 1, 2021, and update the sheriff's website, signage, paperwork, and forms related to bonding as necessary thereafter.

Each sheriff shall file a certificate of compliance with this subsection (2), a copy of the written policies required by subsection (2)(j)(I) of this section, and the notices required by subsections (2)(h)(I)(A) and (2)(i) of this section with the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety, by October 1, 2021, and each October 1 thereafter. Copies of the policies and notices only have to be provided when updated. The sheriff shall use the certificate of compliance form developed by the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety pursuant to section 24-33.5-503 (1)(bb).

Legal Rights Related to Posting Money Bond
Pursuant to Section 16-4-102, Colorado Revised Statutes

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 13-1236), ch. 202, p. 822, § 2, effective May 11.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-191), ch. 288, p. 2666, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(2)(a), (2)(b), and (2)(e) amended and (2)(h), (2)(i), and (2)(j) added, (HB 21-1280), ch. 457, p. 3045, § 1, effective September 7.

16-4-103. Setting and selection type of bond - criteria.

At the first appearance of a person in custody before any court or any person designated by the court to set bond, the court or person shall determine the type of bond and conditions of release unless the person is subject to section 16-4-101.

At a hearing other than an advisement hearing for a person in custody before any court or any person designated by the court to modify or reduce bond, the court shall conduct or set a bond hearing if the case is subject to part 3 of article 4.1 of title 24.

If an indictment, information, or complaint has been filed and the type of bond and conditions of release have been fixed upon return of the indictment or filing of the information or complaint, the court shall review the propriety of the type of bond and conditions of release upon first appearance of a person in custody.

The type of bond and conditions of release shall be sufficient to reasonably ensure the appearance of the person as required and to protect the safety of any person or the community, taking into consideration the individual characteristics of each person in custody, including the person's financial condition.

In determining the type of bond and conditions of release, if practicable and available in the jurisdiction, the court shall use an empirically developed risk assessment instrument designed to improve pretrial release decisions by providing to the court information that classifies a person in custody based upon predicted level of risk of pretrial failure.

When the type of bond and conditions of release are determined by the court, the court shall:

Presume that all persons in custody are eligible for release on bond with the appropriate and least-restrictive conditions consistent with provisions in paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section unless a person is otherwise ineligible for release pursuant to the provisions of section 16-4-101 and section 19 of article II of the Colorado constitution. A monetary condition of release must be reasonable, and any other condition of conduct not mandated by statute must be tailored to address a specific concern.

To the extent a court uses a bond schedule, the court shall incorporate into the bond schedule conditions of release and factors that consider the individualized risk and circumstances of a person in custody and all other relevant criteria and not solely the level of offense; and

Consider all methods of bond and conditions of release to avoid unnecessary pretrial incarceration and levels of community-based supervision as conditions of pretrial release.

The court may also consider the following criteria as appropriate and relevant in making a determination of the type of bond and conditions of release:

The employment status and history of the person in custody;

The nature and extent of family relationships of the person in custody;

Past and present residences of the person in custody;

The character and reputation of the person in custody;

Identity of persons who agree to assist the person in custody in attending court at the proper time;

The likely sentence, considering the nature and the offense presently charged;

The prior criminal record, if any, of the person in custody and any prior failures to appear for court;

Any facts indicating the possibility of violations of the law if the person in custody is released without certain conditions of release;

Any facts indicating that the defendant is likely to intimidate or harass possible witnesses; and

Any other facts tending to indicate that the person in custody has strong ties to the community and is not likely to flee the jurisdiction.

When a person is charged with an offense punishable by fine only, any monetary condition of release shall not exceed the amount of the maximum fine penalty.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 13-1236), ch. 202, p. 822, § 2, effective May 11.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-212), ch. 397, p. 1998, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-049), ch. 152, p. 976, § 5, effective May 6.

16-4-104. Types of bond set by the court.

The court shall determine, after consideration of all relevant criteria, which of the following types of bond is appropriate for the pretrial release of a person in custody, subject to the relevant statutory conditions of release listed in section 16-4-105. The person may be released upon execution of:

An unsecured personal recognizance bond in an amount specified by the court. The court may require additional obligors on the bond as a condition of the bond.

An unsecured personal recognizance bond with additional nonmonetary conditions of release designed specifically to reasonably ensure the appearance of the person in court and the safety of any person or persons or the community;

A bond with secured monetary conditions when reasonable and necessary to ensure the appearance of the person in court or the safety of any person or persons or the community. The financial conditions shall state an amount of money that the person must post with the court in order for the person to be released. The person may be released from custody upon execution of bond in the full amount of money to be secured by any one of the following methods, as selected by the person to be released, unless the court makes factual findings on the record with respect to the person to be released that a certain method of bond, as selected by the court, is necessary to ensure the appearance of the person in court or the safety of any person, persons, or the community:

By a deposit with the clerk of the court of an amount of cash equal to the monetary condition of the bond;

By real estate situated in this state with unencumbered equity not exempt from execution owned by the accused or any other person acting as surety on the bond, which unencumbered equity shall be at least one and one-half the amount of the security set in the bond;

By sureties worth at least one and one-half of the security set in the bond; or

By a bail bonding agent, as defined in section 16-1-104 (3.5).

A bond with secured real estate conditions when it is determined that release on an unsecured personal recognizance bond without monetary conditions will not reasonably ensure the appearance of the person in court or the safety of any person or persons or the community. For a bond secured by real estate, the bond shall not be accepted by the clerk of the court unless the record owner of such property presents to the clerk of the court the original deed of trust as set forth in subparagraph (IV) of this paragraph (d) and the applicable recording fee. Upon receipt of the deed of trust and fee, the clerk of the court shall record the deed of trust with the clerk and recorder for the county in which the property is located. For a bond secured by real estate, the amount of the owner's unencumbered equity shall be determined by deducting the amount of all encumbrances listed in the owner and encumbrances certificate from the actual value of such real estate as shown on the current notice of valuation. The owner of the real estate shall file with the bond the following, which shall constitute a material part of the bond:

The current notice of valuation for such real estate prepared by the county assessor pursuant to section 39-5-121, C.R.S.; and

Evidence of title issued by a title insurance company or agent licensed pursuant to article 11 of title 10, C.R.S., within thirty-five days after the date upon which the bond is filed; and

A sworn statement by the owner of the real estate that the real estate is security for the compliance by the accused with the primary condition of the bond; and

A deed of trust to the public trustee of the county in which the real estate is located that is executed and acknowledged by all record owners of the real estate. The deed of trust shall name the clerk of the court approving the bond as beneficiary. The deed of trust shall secure an amount equal to one and one-half times the amount of the bond.

Unless the district attorney consents or unless the court imposes certain additional individualized conditions of release as described in section 16-4-105, a person must not be released on an unsecured personal recognizance bond pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section under the following circumstances:

The person is presently free on another bond of any kind in another criminal action involving a felony or a class 1 misdemeanor;

The person has a record of conviction of a class 1 misdemeanor within two years or a felony within five years, prior to the bail hearing; or

The person has willfully failed to appear on bond in any case involving a felony or a class 1 misdemeanor charge in the preceding five years.

A person may not be released on an unsecured personal recognizance bond if, at the time of such application, the person is presently on release under a surety bond for felony or class 1 misdemeanor charges unless the surety thereon is notified and afforded an opportunity to surrender the person into custody on such terms as the court deems just under the provisions of section 16-4-108.

Because of the danger posed to any person and the community, a person who is arrested for an offense under section 42-4-1301 (1) or (2)(a), C.R.S., may not attend a bail hearing until the person is no longer intoxicated or under the influence of drugs. The person shall be held in custody until the person may safely attend such hearing.

At the initial hearing, the person has the right to be represented by an attorney and the court shall advise the person of the possible charges, penalties, and the person's rights as specified in rule 5 of the Colorado rules of criminal procedure, unless waived by the person. The court shall notify the public defender of each person in custody before the initial hearing, and each person in custody has the right to be represented by a public defender at the hearing. The court shall provide the person's attorney sufficient time to prepare for and present an individualized argument regarding the type of bond and conditions of release at the initial hearing, consistent with the court's docket and scheduling priorities.

The prosecuting attorney has the right to be notified of each person set for initial hearing, to appear at all initial hearings to provide his or her position regarding the type of bond and conditions of release, and shall be provided sufficient time by the court to prepare for and present any relevant argument, consistent with the court's docket and scheduling priorities.

Prior to the initial hearing, any pretrial services agency operating in that county, or any other agency that reports to the court, that has conducted a pretrial release assessment or gathered information for the court's consideration at the initial hearing shall provide to the prosecution and the person's attorney all information provided to the court regarding the person in custody, which shall include, if provided, the arrest warrant, the probable cause statement, and the person's criminal history.

The sheriff's office and jail personnel shall provide the public defender's office or private counsel access to the person who will be appearing at the hearing and shall allow sufficient time with the person prior to the hearing in order to prepare for the initial hearing.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 13-1236), ch. 202, p. 824, § 2, effective May 11.

L. 2014:

IP(1)(c) amended, (SB 14-212), ch. 397, p. 1998, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(5), (6), (7), and (8) added, (HB 21-1280), ch. 457, p. 3049, § 2, effective September 7.

16-4-105. Conditions of release on bond.

For each bond, the court shall require that the released person appear to answer the charge against the person at a place and upon a date certain and at any place or upon any date to which the proceeding is transferred or continued. This condition is the only condition for which a breach of surety or security on the bail bond may be subject to forfeiture.

For a person who has been arrested for a felony offense, the court shall require as a condition of a bond that the person execute a waiver of extradition stating the person consents to extradition to this state and waives all formal procedures incidental to extradition proceedings in the event that he or she is arrested in another state while at liberty on such bail bond and acknowledging that he or she shall not be admitted to bail in any other state pending extradition to this state.

Additional conditions of every bond is that the released person shall not commit any felony while free on such a bail bond, and the court in which the action is pending has the power to revoke the release of the person, to change any bond condition, including the amount of any monetary condition if it is shown that a competent court has found probable cause to believe that the defendant has committed a felony while released, pending the resolution of a prior felony charge.

An additional condition of every bond in cases involving domestic violence as defined in section 18-6-800.3 (1), C.R.S., in cases of stalking under section 18-3-602, C.R.S., or in cases involving unlawful sexual behavior as defined in section 16-22-102 (9), is that the released person acknowledge the protection order as provided in section 18-1-1001 (5), C.R.S.

(4.1) Notwithstanding any other type of bond and conditions of release set by the court, in cases involving domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3 (1), or in cases where the court subjects a defendant to a mandatory protection order that qualifies as an order described in 18 U.S.C. sec. 922 (g)(8), the court shall order the defendant to comply with the provisions of section 18-1-1001 as it relates to firearm relinquishment.

An additional condition of every bond in a case of an offense under section 42-2-138 (1)(d)(I), C.R.S., of driving while such person's driver's license or privilege to drive, either as a resident or nonresident, is restrained solely or partially because of a conviction of a driving offense pursuant to section 42-4-1301 (1) or (2)(a), C.R.S., is that such person not drive any motor vehicle during the period of such driving restraint.

If a person is arrested for driving under the influence or driving while ability impaired, pursuant to section 42-4-1301, C.R.S., and the person has one or more previous convictions for an offense in section 42-4-1301, C.R.S., or one or more convictions in any other jurisdiction that would constitute a violation of section 42-4-1301, C.R.S., as a condition of any bond, the court shall order that the person abstain from the use of alcohol or illegal drugs, and such abstinence shall be monitored.

A person seeking relief from any of the conditions imposed pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section shall file a motion with the court, and the court shall conduct a hearing upon the motion. The court shall consider whether the condition from which the person is seeking relief is in the interest of justice and whether public safety would be endangered if the condition were not enforced. When determining whether to grant relief pursuant to this subsection (6)(b), the court shall consider whether the person has voluntarily enrolled and is participating in an appropriate substance use disorder treatment program.

Notwithstanding subsection (6)(a) or any other provision of this section, if a person possesses a valid registry identification card, as defined in section 25-1.5-106 (2)(e), that establishes that he or she is a patient who uses medical marijuana, the court shall not require as a condition of any bond that the person abstain from the use of medical marijuana.

A person may be released on a bond with monetary condition of bond, when appropriate, as described in section 16-4-104 (1)(c).

In addition to the conditions specified in this section, the court may impose any additional conditions on the conduct of the person released that will assist in obtaining the appearance of the person in court and the safety of any person or persons and the community. These conditions may include, but are not limited to, supervision by a qualified person or organization or supervision by a pretrial services program established pursuant to section 16-4-106. While under the supervision of a qualified organization or pretrial services program, the conditions of release imposed by the court may include, but are not limited to:

Periodic telephone contact with the program;

Periodic office visits by the person to the pretrial services program or organization;

Periodic visits to the person's home by the program or organization;

Treatment of the person's behavioral, mental health, or substance use disorder, if applicable, including residential treatment if the defendant consents to the treatment;

Periodic alcohol or drug testing of the person;

Domestic violence counseling for the defendant if the defendant consents to the counseling;

Electronic or global position monitoring of the person;

Pretrial work release for the person; and

Other supervision techniques shown by research to increase court appearance and public safety rates for persons released on bond.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 13-1236), ch. 202, p. 826, § 2, effective May 11.

L. 2014:

(4) amended, (SB 14-212), ch. 397, p. 1999, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(4) amended, (HB 15-1060), ch. 45, p. 112, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 2017:

(6)(b) and (8)(d) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1296, § 118, effective May 25; (6)(c) added, (SB 17-178), ch. 115, p. 413, § 1, August 9.

L. 2021:

(4.1) added, (HB 21-1255), ch. 293, p. 1753, § 5, effective June 22.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

16-4-105.5. Notification of court reminder program. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-036), ch. 293, p. 2687, § 3, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

Entire section repealed, (SB 22-018), ch. 191, p. 1273, § 3, effective July 15.